Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA STATE POULTRY ASSOCIATION.new text end new text begin $2,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for a grant to the Minnesota State Poultry Association to promote youth poultry programs in Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of fiscal year 2026 and is available for fiscal year 2027. new text end